Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8177.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds that:
(1) Access to suicide prevention and behavioral health crisis intervention is essential to
protecting public health and safety;
(2) Congress enacted the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020, which
authorized states to implement and fund a 988 crisis hotline;
(3) The State of Rhode Island must create a reliable, sustainable funding source to support
its 988 call center infrastructure;
(4) The designated 988 call center must operate independently from state agencies and
focus exclusively on the core responsibilities of answering 988 calls, texts, and chats, consistent
with federal law; and
(5) Consolidating all applicable revenue sources into a single restricted receipt fund will
ensure fiscal integrity and long-term sustainability.
SECTION 2. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND
CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 21.3
988 CALL CENTER FUNDING AND OPERATIONS ACT
39-21.3-1. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:
(1) "988 call center" means the designated, non-governmental entity operating the federally
approved in-state contact center for the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline, exclusively
responsible for answering and responding to 988 contacts originating in Rhode Island.
(2) "988 fee" means the monthly surcharge levied on telecommunications services to
support the operation of 911 and/or first responder services and the 988 call center.
(3) "Lifeline administrator" means the entity that contracts with the Substance Abuse and
Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) to oversee in excess of two hundred (200)
contact centers and ensures they meets all requirements.
(4) “Operator” means the nonprofit entity designated to oversee the 988 call center pursuant
to § 39-21.3-4.
(5) "Telecommunications provider" means any person or entity that provides commercial
mobile radio service, interconnected VoIP service, or wireless telecommunications service to end
users in the state.
(6) "Subscriber" means a person or entity billed for telecommunications services with a
service address in Rhode Island.
39-21.3-2. 988 Call center – Restricted receipt account.
(a) There is hereby established a restricted receipt account, known as the "988 call center
fund," to be held and administered by the office of the general treasurer.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Revenue collected from the 988 fee established pursuant to § 39-21.1-14;
(2) Legislative appropriations designated for 988 operations;
(3) Federal block grant allocations or other federal funds specifically allocated for 988 or
crisis hotline services; and
(4) Interest or investment income earned on monies deposited in the fund.
(c) The Rhode Island division of taxation shall deposit all remittances into the 988 call
center fund.
39-21.3-3. Authorized uses of the trust fund.
(a) Monies in the 988 call center fund shall be used to support the 988 call center budget
to:
(1) Operate, staff, and maintain the 988 call center;
(2) Acquire, upgrade, and maintain technology or telecommunications infrastructure for
988 call center use;
(3) Provide required training for call center staff in accordance with federal 988 program
LC005379 - Page 2 of 11

standards; and
(4) Conduct public awareness and first responder outreach efforts about the availability
and use of 988.
(b) Monies shall not be used to:
(1) Deliver or fund behavioral health treatment, case management, or clinical services;
(2) Expand into service areas beyond those allowed by the National Suicide Hotline
Designation Act or implementing SAMHSA guidance; or
(3) Fund operations, staff, or administration of any state agency.
39-21.3-4. Governance and independence of 988 call center operations.
(a) The 988 call center shall be operated by a nonprofit entity appointed by the general
assembly and approved by the lifeline administrator designated by SAMHSA in accordance with
federal grant requirements.
(b) The call center shall operate collaboratively with all Rhode Island executive
departments and shall not be subject to oversight, direction, or operational control by any sole state
agency.
(c) The operator may establish an advisory board to promote compliance with national
standards and best practices. An advisory board, if established at the direction of the operator, shall
consist of professionals with expertise in children, adolescent, and adult behavioral health.
39-21.3-5. Oversight and reporting.
(a) The operator shall submit an annual report to the general assembly by February 1 of
each year detailing:
(1) Revenue by category including, but not limited to, 988 fees, grants, and appropriations;
(2) Expenditures by category including, but not limited to, staffing, training, and
technology; and
(3) Service performance metrics including, but not limited to, call volume, wait times, and
abandonments.
(b) The Rhode Island auditor general shall conduct an annual audit of the 988 call center
fund and provide the results to the speaker of the house; the president of the senate; the house of
representatives finance committee chair; and the senate finance committee chair.
SECTION 3. Section 35-4-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-4 entitled "State Funds"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-4-27. Indirect cost recoveries on restricted receipt accounts.
Indirect cost recoveries of fifteen percent (15%) of cash receipts shall be transferred from
all restricted receipt accounts, to be recorded as general revenues in the general fund. However,
LC005379 - Page 3 of 11

there shall be no transfer from cash receipts with restrictions received exclusively: (1) From
contributions from nonprofit charitable organizations; (2) From the assessment of indirect cost-
recovery rates on federal grant funds; or (3) Through transfers from state agencies to the department
of administration for the payment of debt service. These indirect cost recoveries shall be applied to
all accounts, unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, court order, or court settlement. The
following restricted receipt accounts shall not be subject to the provisions of this section:
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
HIV Care Grant Drug Rebates
Health System Transformation Project
Rhode Island Statewide Opioid Abatement Account
HCBS Support-ARPA
HCBS Admin Support-ARPA
Department of Human Services
Organ Transplant Fund
Veterans’ home — Restricted account
Veterans’ home — Resident benefits
Pharmaceutical Rebates Account
Demand Side Management Grants
Veteran’s Cemetery Memorial Fund
Donations — New Veterans’ Home Construction
Commodity Supplemental Food Program-Claims
Department of Health
Pandemic medications and equipment account
Miscellaneous Donations/Grants from Non-Profits
State Loan Repayment Match
Healthcare Information Technology
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Eleanor Slater non-Medicaid third-party payor account
Hospital Medicare Part D Receipts
RICLAS Group Home Operations
Group Home Facility Improvement Fund
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Emergency and public communication access account
Department of Environmental Management
LC005379 - Page 4 of 11

National heritage revolving fund
Environmental response fund II
Underground storage tanks registration fees
De Coppet Estate Fund
Rhode Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
Historic preservation revolving loan fund
Historic Preservation loan fund — Interest revenue
Department of Public Safety
E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System
Forfeited property — Retained
988 Call Center Fund
Forfeitures — Federal
Forfeited property — Gambling
Donation — Polygraph and Law Enforcement Training
Rhode Island State Firefighter’s League Training Account
Fire Academy Training Fees Account
Attorney General
Forfeiture of property
Federal forfeitures
Attorney General multi-state account
Forfeited property — Gambling
Department of Administration
Health Insurance Market Integrity Fund
RI Health Benefits Exchange
Information Technology restricted receipt account
Restore and replacement — Insurance coverage
Convention Center Authority rental payments
Investment Receipts — TANS
OPEB System Restricted Receipt Account
Grants Management Administration
Office of Energy Resources
OER Reconciliation Funding
RGGI Executive Climate Change Coordinating Council Projects
Electric Vehicle Charging Stations Operating and Maintenance Account
LC005379 - Page 5 of 11

Clean Transportation Programs
Department of Housing
Housing Resources and Homelessness Restricted Receipt Account
Housing Production Fund
Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund
Department of Revenue
Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share
DMV Modernization Project
Jobs Tax Credit Redemption Fund
Legislature
Audit of federal assisted programs
Department of Children, Youth and Families
Children’s Trust Accounts — SSI
Military Staff
RI Military Family Relief Fund
RI National Guard Counterdrug Program
Treasury
Admin. Expenses — State Retirement System
Retirement — Treasury Investment Options
Defined Contribution — Administration - RR
Violent Crimes Compensation — Refunds
Treasury Research Fellowship
Business Regulation
Banking Division Reimbursement Account
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner Reimbursement Account
Securities Division Reimbursement Account
Commercial Licensing and Racing and Athletics Division Reimbursement Account
Insurance Division Reimbursement Account
Historic Preservation Tax Credit Account
Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission
Marijuana Trust Fund
Social Equity Assistance Fund
Judiciary
Arbitration Fund Restricted Receipt Account
LC005379 - Page 6 of 11

Third-Party Grants
RI Judiciary Technology Surcharge Account
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Statewide Student Transportation Services Account
School for the Deaf Fee-for-Service Account
School for the Deaf — School Breakfast and Lunch Program
Davies Career and Technical School Local Education Aid Account
Davies — National School Breakfast & Lunch Program
School Construction Services
Office of the Postsecondary Commissioner
Tuition Savings Program Fund
Higher Education and Industry Center
IGT STEM Scholarships
Department of Labor and Training
Job Development Fund
Contractor Training Restricted Receipt Account
Workers’ Compensation Administrative Account
Rhode Island Council on the Arts
Governors’ Portrait Donation Fund
Statewide records management system account
SECTION 4. Section 39-21.1-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-21.1 entitled "911
Emergency Telephone Number Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-21.1-14. E-911 surcharge and first response surcharge.
(a)(1) A monthly E-911 surcharge of fifty cents ($.50) is hereby levied upon each residence
and business telephone line or trunk, or path and data, telephony, internet, voice over internet
protocol (VoIP) wireline, line, trunk, or path in the state including PBX trunks and centrex
equivalent trunks and each line or trunk serving, and upon each user interface number or extension
number or similarly identifiable line, trunk, or path to or from a digital network (such as, but not
exclusive of, integrated services digital network (ISDN), Flexpath, or comparable digital private
branch exchange, or connecting to or from a customer-based or dedicated telephone switch site
(such as, but not exclusive of, a private branch exchange (PBX)), or connecting to or from a
customer-based or dedicated central office (such as, but not exclusive of, a centrex system but
exclusive of trunks and lines provided to wireless communication companies) that can access to,
connect with, or interface with the Rhode Island E-911 uniform emergency telephone system (RI
LC005379 - Page 7 of 11

E-911). In each instance where a surcharge is levied pursuant to this subsection (a)(1) there shall
also be a monthly first response surcharge of fifty cents ($.50) and a monthly 988 surcharge of fifty
cents ($.50) and a monthly 988 fee of ______cents ($.__). The surcharges shall be billed by each
telecommunication services provider at the inception of services and shall be payable to the
telecommunication services provider by the subscriber of the services.
(2) A monthly E-911 surcharge of fifty cents ($.50) and a monthly 988 fee of ______cents
($.__) are is hereby levied on each wireless instrument, device, or means, including prepaid,
cellular, telephony, internet, voice over internet protocol (VoIP), satellite, computer, radio,
communication, data or data only wireless lines, or any other wireless instrument, device, or means
that has access to, connects with, or activates or interfaces or any combination thereof with the E-
911 uniform emergency telephone system. In each instance where a surcharge is levied pursuant to
this subsection (a)(2) there shall also be a monthly first response surcharge of seventy-five cents
($.75). The surcharges shall be billed by each telecommunication services provider and shall be
payable to the telecommunication services provider by the subscriber. Prepaid wireless
telecommunications services shall not be included in this act, but shall be governed by chapter 21.2
of this title. The E-911 uniform emergency telephone system shall establish, by rule or regulation,
an appropriate funding mechanism to recover from the general body of ratepayers this surcharge.
(b) The amount of the surcharges shall not be subject to the tax imposed under chapter 18
of title 44 nor be included within the telephone common carrier’s gross earnings for the purpose of
computing the tax under chapter 13 of title 44.
(c) Each telephone common carrier and each telecommunication services provider shall
establish a special account to which it shall deposit on a monthly basis the amounts collected as
surcharges under this section.
(d) The money collected by each telecommunication services provider shall be transferred
within sixty (60) days after its inception of wireline, wireless, prepaid, cellular, telephony, voice
over internet protocol (VoIP), satellite, computer, internet, or communications services in this state
and every month thereafter, to the division of taxation, together with the accrued interest. The E-
911 surcharge shall be deposited in a restricted-receipt account and used solely for the operation of
the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system. The first response surcharge shall be deposited in
the general fund; provided, however, that ten percent (10%) of the money collected from the first
response surcharge shall be deposited in the information technology restricted receipt account
(ITRR account) established pursuant to § 42-11-2.5(a). The 988 surcharge shall be deposited in the
988 call center fund established pursuant to § 39-21.3-3. Any money not transferred in accordance
with this subsection shall be assessed interest at the rate set forth in § 44-1-7 from the date the
LC005379 - Page 8 of 11

money should have been transferred.
(e) Every billed subscriber-user shall be liable for any surcharge imposed under this section
until it has been paid to the telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider. Any
surcharge shall be added to and shall be stated separately in the billing by the telephone common
carrier or telecommunication services provider and shall be collected by the telephone common
carrier or telecommunication services provider.
(f) Each telephone common carrier and telecommunication services provider shall annually
provide the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division, or any other agency that may
replace it, with a list of amounts uncollected, together with the names and addresses of its
subscriber-users who can be determined by the telephone common carrier or telecommunication
services provider to have not paid the E-911 surcharge.
(g) Included within, but not limited to, the purposes for which the money collected from
the E-911 surcharge may be used, are rent, lease, purchase, improvement, construction,
maintenance, repair, and utilities for the equipment and site or sites occupied by the E-911 uniform
emergency telephone system; salaries, benefits, and other associated personnel costs; acquisition,
upgrade, or modification of PSAP equipment to be capable of receiving E-911 information,
including necessary computer hardware, software, and database provisioning, addressing, and non-
recurring costs of establishing emergency services; network development, operation, and
maintenance; database development, operation, and maintenance; on-premise equipment
maintenance and operation; training emergency service personnel regarding use of E-911;
educating consumers regarding the operations, limitations, role, and responsible use of E-911;
reimbursement to telephone common carriers or telecommunication services providers of rates or
recurring costs associated with any services, operation, administration, or maintenance of E-911
services as approved by the division; reimbursement to telecommunication services providers or
telephone common carriers of other costs associated with providing E-911 services, including the
cost of the design, development, and implementation of equipment or software necessary to provide
E-911 service information to PSAPs, as approved by the division.
(h) [Deleted by P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 28, § 1.]
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to constitute rate regulation of wireless
communication services carriers, nor shall this section be construed to prohibit wireless
communication services carriers from charging subscribers for any wireless service or feature.
(j) [Deleted by P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 4, § 1.]
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
LC005379 - Page 9 of 11

========
LC005379
========
LC005379 - Page 10 of 11